District of Columbia statutes.
3-1441

Establishment of the Commission on African-American Affairs.

There is established a Commission on African-American Affairs (“Commission”) to advise the Mayor, the Council, and the public on the views and needs of African-American communities with low-economic, -education, or -health indicators in the District and to analyze the decline of African-American residents as indicated by the 2010 United States Census.

Mar. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-106, § 2, 59 DCR 440

History

This section is referenced in § 1-523.01.

Section References